Wyoming statutes. Title 28 Legislature
Article 4. Select Natural Resource Funding Committee

§ 28-11-401.
Appointment of members; powers and duties; related duties of wildlife and natural resource trust account board.

Not later than March 15 following each general election, a select natural resource funding committee shall be appointed subject to the following:

The president of the senate shall appoint three (3) members of the senate apportioned as nearly as possible to reflect the percentage of the elected membership of the majority and minority parties of the senate, provided not more than two (2) of the members shall be from the same political party;

The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint three (3) members of the house apportioned as nearly as possible to reflect the percentage of the elected membership of the majority and minority parties of the house, provided not more than two (2) of the members shall be from the same political party.

The select committee shall:

Select from among its members two (2) members to serve as co-chairmen;

Monitor wildlife and natural resource trust account board progress with regard to projects specified in W.S.

9-15-101

et seq. and other projects specified by law;

Review the budgets of all projects funded from the wildlife and natural resource trust income account as created in W.S. 9-15-103(b) and sponsor legislation to fund expenditures from the account as recommended by the select committee.

The wildlife and natural resource trust account board shall:

Provide the select committee with notice of all board meetings. The select committee and the board may hold joint meetings;

Provide information to the select committee upon request to assist the select committee to monitor progress of projects.

The select committee may:

Secure consulting services, if necessary, to provide technical assistance in reviewing project grant applications, budgets or other issues related to projects funded under this act;

Review the project grant applications for large projects forwarded by the wildlife and natural resource trust account board.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 225, § 1; 2008, ch. 10, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to the Wyoming wildlife and natural resource trust account board, see §

9-15-104

and the notes thereto.

For Wyoming wildlife and natural resource large project funding, see §

9-15-201

.

The 2008 amendment,

substituted “two (2) members to serve as co-chairmen” for “a chairman and vice-chairman” in (b)(i).

Laws 2008, ch. 10, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2008.

Editor's notes. —

The governor vetoed language in (d)(ii) that would have allowed the committee to review grant applications for small projects in excess of a $200,000 annual limit on small project funding by the board.

Temporary provisions. —

Laws 2005, ch. 225, § 3, provides that, notwithstanding the date specified in W.S.

28-11-401

, initial appointments to the select natural resource funding committee are to be made not later than July 15, 2005.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2005, ch. 225, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2005.